Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,211.04
Applicability of other laws.

Sections 60-6,211.01 to 60-6,211.03 shall not operate to prevent any person, regardless of age, from being prosecuted or having any action taken for a violation of section 60-6,196 or 60-6,197 or having his or her operator's license revoked pursuant to sections 60-498.01 to 60-498.04 for a violation of section 60-6,196 or 60-6,197 or from being prosecuted or having any action taken under any other provision of law. If such person is believed to be under the influence of alcoholic liquor pursuant to section 60-6,196 or 60-6,197, sections 60-6,211.01 to 60-6,211.03 shall not operate to prevent prosecution of such person for a violation of section 60-6,196 or 60-6,197 even if sections 60-6,211.01 to 60-6,211.03 apply.

Laws 1993, LB 564, § 5;

Laws 2003, LB 209, § 14;

Laws 2004, LB 208, § 21.